California, session 20252026, AB2483.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 4960) is added to Part 4 of Division 4 of the Public Resources Code, to read: CHAPTER 2. Formerly Incarcerated Firefighter Certification and Employment Program4960. (a) (1) On and after July 1, 2027, the department shall, in partnership with the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation and the California Conservation Camp program, implement a standardized process to ensure that all eligible individuals who successfully complete training in a department firefighting training camp while incarcerated receive official written certification reflective of the training completed before their release from prison.(2) The official written certification pursuant to paragraph (1) shall include certification commensurate with the individual’s training towards meeting relevant minimum requirements for Fire Fighter 1 Classification or Forestry Technician Classification.(b) On and after January 1, 2028, if a qualified formerly incarcerated individual applies for a Fire Fighter 1 Classification position position, or any successor classifications, with the department and has the required training and meets the minimum qualifications for the position, the department shall award hiring preference to the qualified formerly incarcerated individual under Category Placement 2.(c) On and after January 1, 2028, if a qualified formerly incarcerated individual applies for a Forestry Technician Classification position position, or any successor classifications, with the department, the department shall count the duration of training pursuant to subdivision (a) and field work as an incarcerated hand crew member towards the minimum qualifications for the Forestry Technician classification, and shall award hiring preference to the qualified formerly incarcerated individual. classification.(d) Nothing in this section shall preclude the department from placing a formerly incarcerated person in a higher category for hiring based on their level of training, certification, employment history, or other factors.(e) Nothing in this section shall preclude other state agencies with wildland management responsibilities from establishing similar pathways to support wildfire prevention, mitigation, and response efforts with priority hiring reserved for formerly incarcerated individuals who completed the FFT program.(f) For the purposes of this section, “qualified formerly incarcerated individual” means any formerly incarcerated individual who successfully completed training in a department firefighting training camp, has a valid certification pursuant to subdivision (a), and has successfully participated as an incarcerated hand crew member in the California Conservation Camp program as described in Section 1203.4b of the Penal Code.(g)If the department establishes new entry level classifications or positions, including, but not limited to, the successor classifications of those mentioned in this chapter, and the training described in subdivision (a) matches the minimum qualifications for these new classifications or positions, the department may provide hiring preference analogous to that described in this chapter to qualified formerly incarcerated individuals.